Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 1 General Provisions

46-4-1.
Bringing of actions by commission to enjoin violations of rules, orders, or regulations established for safe installation and operation of natural gas facilities.

The commission may bring a civil action to enjoin the violation of any rule, order, or regulation established by the commission for the safe installation and operation of all natural gas transmission and distribution facilities within this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-419, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 158, § 1.